District of Columbia statutes.
26-1017

Authorized delegate conduct.

(a)

An authorizing delegate shall not make any fraudulent or false statement or misrepresentation to a licensee or to the Superintendent [Commissioner].

(b)

All money transmission or sale or issuance of payment instrument activities conducted by authorized delegates shall be strictly in accordance with the licensee’s written procedures provided to the authorized delegate.

(c)

An authorized delegate shall remit all money owing to the licensee in accordance with the terms of the contract between the licensee and the authorized delegate. An authorized delegate who fails to remit all money owing to a licensee within the time required shall be liable to the licensee for treble damages. The Superintendent [Commissioner] shall have the discretion to set, by regulation, the maximum remittance time.

(d)

An authorized delegate is deemed to consent to inspection by the Superintendent [Commissioner], with or without prior notice to the licensee or authorized delegate, of the books and records of the authorized delegate when the Superintendent [Commissioner] has a reasonable basis to believe that the licensee or authorized delegate is not in compliance with this chapter.

(e)

An authorized delegate is under a duty to act only as authorized under the contract with the licensee. An authorized delegate who exceeds its authority is subject to cancellation of its contract and further disciplinary action by the Superintendent [Commissioner].

(f)

All funds, less fees, received by an authorized delegate of a licensee from the sale or delivery of a payment instrument issued by a licensee or received by an authorized delegate for transmission shall, from the time such funds are received by such authorized delegate until such time when the funds or an equivalent amount are remitted by the authorized delegate to the licensee, constitute trust funds owned by and belonging to the licensee. If an authorized delegate commingles any such funds with any other funds or property owned or controlled by the authorized delegate, all commingled proceeds and other property shall be impressed with a trust in favor of the licensee in an amount equal to the amount of the proceeds due the licensee.

(g)

An authorized delegate shall report to the licensee the theft or loss of payment instruments within 24 hours from the time it knew or should have known of the theft or loss.

July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-140, § 18, 47 DCR 3431